Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.550

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Not subject to interest arbitration.

Disability leave supplement payments for employees covered by chapter 462, Laws of 1985 shall not be subject to interest arbitration as defined in RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.905.

[ 1985 c 462 s 14.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.